Hawaii, session 2026, GM1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Act 237, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2025, established a statewide food and product
innovation network within the agribusiness development
corporation to advance value-added manufacturing, exports, and
food security.
The legislature further finds that international best
practices observed in Australia, New Zealand, and Singapore
demonstrate that successful food innovation networks integrate:
(1) Embedded food safety and regulatory frameworks;
(2) Measurable performance indicators aligned between
governing boards and legislative oversight;
(3) Coordinated logistics, tourism, and export
infrastructure;
(4) Unified place-based branding strategies; and
(5) Sustained international partnerships and market
access.
2026-2477 SB3320 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiHiiiiiiMiiiiiinn

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The purpose of this Act is to strengthen the food and
product innovation network by refining governance, performance
accountability, regulatory integration, branding, export
facilitation, and international engagement in alignment with
existing law and the State's food security and economic
diversification goals.
SECTION 2. Chapter 163D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By designating section 163D-20 as part lA, and
inserting a title before section 163D-20 to read:
"PART lA. FOOD AND PRODUCT INNOVATION NETWORK"
2. By adding six new sections to part lA to be
appropriately designated and to read:
"§163D-A Food safety and regulatory framework integration,
(a) The food and product innovation network shall incorporate a
coordinated food safety and regulatory framework across all
primary and partner members.
(b) The framework shall include but not be limited to:
(1) Alignment with applicable federal and state food
safety laws, regulations, rules, and food codes;
2026-2477 SB3320 CDl SMA.docx 2
iiiiinHiiinHiiiiiiiiiininiii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Technical assistance for labeling, testing,
validation, and certification requirements;
(3) Coordjjiatdon with the de£a£tment of health^unj^yersi^
of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human
resilience, and other relevant agencies; and
(4) Integration of regulatory compliance education into
workforce development and training programs offered
through the food and product innovation network.
(c) The corporation may enter into memoranda of agreement
or other arrangements necessary to implement this section.
§163D--B Food and product innovation network; key
performance indicators. (a) In consultation with the board,
the corporation shall establish key performance indicators for
the food and product innovation network.
IS (b) The key performance indicators shall include but not
be limited to;
(1) Number of businesses served and graduating to
independent commercial operations;
(2) Increases in value-added agricultural and food
manufacturing output;
(3) Export growth and market diversification;
2026-2477 SB3320 GDI SMA.docx 3
liliHIIIMDIHIIHlIi

Page 4 3320
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(4) Workforce training and credential attainment;
(5) Contributions toward the State’s food security goals;
(6) Leveraged private, federal, or philanthropic
investment; and
(7) Growth in revenue and market access for small-scale
producers through the utilization of shared-use
processing, branding, and distribution infrastructure.
(c) The key performance indicators shall be used to inform
the annual report required pursuant to section 163D-E and
strategic alignment among the corporation, board, and the
legislature.
§163D-C Coordination; market access. The corporation
shall develop and implement a coordinated strategy to leverage
state and private sector assets to expand market access for food
and value-added products, including collaboration with the
department of transportation, Hawaii tourism authority,
airlines, harbors, hotels, and logistics providers to facilitate
entry into national and international markets.
§163D-D State branding alignment. (a) In coordination
with relevant state agencies, the corporation shall align and
harmonize the "Hawaii made", "produced in Hawaii", and other
2026-2477 SB3320 GDI SMA.docx
IHHHIMNIIIillHHH

Page 5 S.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
state-supported branding initiatives related to food and
value-added products.
(b) The purpose of branding alignment under this section
shall be to;
(1) Reduce duplication;
(2) Strengthen brand clarity in domestic and international
markets; and
(3) Maximize economic returns for producers and
manufacturers.
§163D-E Surveys; economic data; reports. (a) Surveys
administered by the department of commerce and consumer affairs
and department of business, economic development, and tourism
shall, where practicable, collect and leverage economic data on
indigenous and Native Hawaiian businesses.
(b) Data collected pursuant to this section shall be
shared with the department of business, economic development,
and tourism for economic analysis and reporting purposes,
subject to applicable confidentiality laws.
(c) The corporation shall submit an annual report to the
legislature regarding the data collected pursuant to this
2026-2477 SB3320 GDI SMA.docx 5
IIMiimililllMIHIIIIIill

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
section no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular session.
§163D-F Enterprise zones; expansion. The depa£tinent^of
business, economic development, and tourism shall evaluate
opportunities to expand or adapt enterprise zone incentives in
all counties to better support the food and product innovation
network. '*
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,800,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
operations of the food and product innovation network.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness
development corporation for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. In codifying the new sections added by
section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2477 SB3320 CDl SMA.docx
iiHiHBiiiiniiiiimiiiiiiiii

S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 3320, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
183-26

SB No. 3320, SD1,HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives